Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2678] Execution and validity of
revenue bonds. Revenue bonds issued under this subpart shall bear the
manual signatures or facsimile of the signatures of the chairperson and
secretary of the board, and shall be sealed with the seal of the board or in
lieu thereof shall bear a facsimile of seal. If the board designates a
registrar other than itself for the revenue bonds, the resolution authorizing
the revenue bonds may provide that none of the revenue bonds shall be valid or
obligatory for any purpose unless authenticated by the registrar. If the
resolution provides, all signatures of the board upon the revenue bonds may be
facsimiles of the signatures, and the revenue bonds shall be valid and
obligatory only if authenticated by the manual signature of an authorized
officer or signatory of the registrar. Revenue bonds bearing the signature of
officers in office at the date of the signing thereof shall be valid
obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment
therefor any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have
ceased to be officers. The validity of the bonds shall not depend on or be
affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the
construction or maintenance of the university project, university system, or
network for which the revenue bonds were issued. The resolution authorizing
the issuance of revenue bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a
recital that they are issued pursuant to this subpart, which recital shall be
conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.
[L 2007, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next